Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-322.04
Sexual abuse of a protected individual; penalties.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) Person means an individual employed by the Department of Health and Human Services and includes, but is not limited to, any individual working in central administration or regional service areas or facilities of the department and any individual to whom the department has authorized or delegated control over a protected individual or a protected individual's activities, whether by contract or otherwise; and

(b) Protected individual means an individual in the care or custody of the department.

(2) A person commits the offense of sexual abuse of a protected individual if the person subjects a protected individual to sexual penetration or sexual contact as those terms are defined in section 28-318. It is not a defense to a charge under this section that the protected individual consented to such sexual penetration or sexual contact.

(3) Any person who subjects a protected individual to sexual penetration is guilty of sexual abuse of a protected individual in the first degree. Sexual abuse of a protected individual in the first degree is a Class IIA felony.

(4) Any person who subjects a protected individual to sexual contact is guilty of sexual abuse of a protected individual in the second degree. Sexual abuse of a protected individual in the second degree is a Class IIIA felony.

Laws 2003, LB 17, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 26;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 21.

Registration of sex offenders, see sections 29-4001 to 29-4014.

Under this section, the word "subject" means to cause to undergo the action of something specified. State v. Wood, 296 Neb. 738, 895 N.W.2d 701 (2017).